District of Columbia statutes.
1-723

Information about retirement programs.

Upon a request of the Board, the Mayor, the Chief Financial Officer, the Chairman of the District of Columbia Public Charter School Board, the President of the Board of Education, or their successors shall furnish to the Board such information with respect to retirement programs and post employment benefit programs to which this chapter applies as the Board considers necessary to enable it to carry out its responsibilities under this chapter and to enable the enrolled actuary engaged pursuant to § 1-722(a) to carry out the responsibilities of the enrolled actuary under this chapter.

Nov. 17, 1979, 93 Stat. 866, Pub. L. 96-122, § 143
Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-205, § 1012(c), 51 DCR 8441
1981 Ed., § 1-723.
1973 Ed., § 1-1823.
D.C. Law 15-205 substituted “Mayor, the Chief Financial Officer, the Chairman of the District of Columbia Public Charter School Board, the President of the Board of Education, or their successors shall furnish to the Board such information with respect to retirement programs and post employment benefit programs” for “Mayor shall furnish to the Board such information with respect to retirement programs”.
For conditional applicability of subtitle B of Title I of D.C. Law 15-205, see notes under § 1-911.04a.